District of Columbia statutes.
9-807

Transfers of property by federal agencies.

Any executive department, independent establishment, or agency of the federal government or the District of Columbia, for the purposes of carrying out this chapter, is authorized to transfer to the Administrator, without compensation, upon his request, any lands, interests in lands (including avigation easements or airspace rights), buildings, property, or equipment under its control and in excess of its own requirements, which the Administrator may consider necessary or desirable for the construction, care, operation, maintenance, improvement, or protection of the airport.

History

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 772, ch. 905, § 7
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 85-726, title XIV, § 1402(g)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1207.
1973 Ed., § 7-1407.